Hawaii statutes.
§291E-45 Eligibility for relicensing and
reregistration of motor vehicle. (a) To be eligible for relicensing or
renewing the privilege to operate a vessel after a period of administrative
revocation has expired, the person shall:

(1) Submit proof to the director of compliance with
all conditions imposed by the director;

(2) Obtain a certified statement from the director
indicating eligibility for relicensing and for renewing the privilege to
operate a vessel;

(3) Present the certified statement to the
appropriate licensing official or to the department of land and natural
resources, as applicable; and

(4) Successfully complete each requirement, including
payment of all applicable fees, for:

(A) Obtaining a new license in this State,
pursuant to chapter 286; or

(B) Renewing the privilege to operate a
vessel, as may be provided in chapter 200 or rules adopted by the department of
land and natural resources pursuant to section 200‑24.

(b) To be eligible for reregistration of a
motor vehicle, if applicable, after a period of administrative revocation has
expired, the person shall:

(1) Submit proof to the director of compliance with
all conditions imposed by the director;

(2) Obtain a certified statement from the director
indicating eligibility for registration of a motor vehicle;

(3) Present the certified statement to the director
of the appropriate county agency; and

(4) Successfully complete each requirement, as
provided in chapter 286, for obtaining a new certificate of registration for a
motor vehicle in this State, including payment of all applicable fees. [L 2000,
c 189, pt of §23; am L 2001, c 157, §24; am L 2010, c 166, §17]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next